Tennessee, session 114, SB1589.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 41-4-140(a), is amended by adding
the following new subdivisions:
(6) Establish certification requirements for corrections officers; and
(7) Inspect and certify local correctional training academies associated with local
jails, lock-ups, and workhouses.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 41-4-140, is amended by deleting
subsection (d) and substituting:
(d)
(1) A local currently certified facility must not be decertified if the local
government has submitted a plan of action within ninety (90) days of the initial
annual inspection that is reasonably expected to eliminate fixed ratio
deficiencies, staffing emergencies, capital projects, or deficiencies that do not
impact the life or safety of the inmates or employees in that facility and cause
that facility to remain certified. A plan of action must not:
(A) Exceed five (5) consecutive years without unanimous
approval from the board of control;
(B) Exceed twelve (12) months if the board of control determines
that reasonable efforts by the local government could have resolved the
deficiency; and
SB1589
009677
- 1 -

(C) Be approved for deficiencies that directly impact the safety
and security of the facility or public welfare.
(2) The board of control may direct the executive director to consult with
necessary state agencies to ensure the safety and security of the facility prior to
approving an extension exceeding five (5) years.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 41-7-106, is amended by adding the
following new subsections:
(j) The board is authorized to establish uniform standards for the training of
corrections recruits and corrections officers, including requirements for corrections
officer certification, continued certification, and revocation of certification.
(k) The board is authorized to establish uniform standards for the certification of
local correctional training academies for the purpose of training corrections recruits and
corrections officers.
(l) The board may issue, or revoke as required, special certifications to persons
who, by reason of experience and completion of in-service training, advanced education,
or specialized training, are especially qualified for particular aspects or classes relevant
to the corrections profession.
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1315(a)(1)(A), is amended by
adding the following as a new subdivision (a)(1)(A)(iv) and redesignating the existing
subdivision (a)(1)(A)(iv) as subdivision (a)(1)(A)(v):
(iv) Any director or full-time employee of the Tennessee corrections institute in
the performance of the director or employee's duty; or
SECTION 5. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 009677